Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5928XS (3) 91 dg/ko S.F. 2156 Section 1. Section 598.41, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. a. A court may, as part of an order 3 granting custody of a child, order a parent of the child to 4 undergo drug testing for a period of time and at a frequency 5 the court determines will serve the best interest of the child. 6 b. If a parent fails a drug test ordered under this 7 subsection, the court may revise the order granting custody of 8 the parentâs child as the court determines will serve the best 9 interest of the child. 10 c. The results of a drug test ordered under this subsection 11 shall be confidential except for the parties to the proceeding 12 in which the drug testing was ordered. 13 d. A parent ordered to undergo drug testing under this 14 subsection shall pay for the costs of the drug testing. 15